en: phyllo dough sheet, filo pastry sheet
fr: feuille de pâte filo, feuille de filo, feuille de pâte phyllo

en: raw shortbread dough
fr: pâte sablée crue

en: shortcrust dough
da: mørdej
de: Mürbeteig
es: masa quebrada
fi: murotaikina
fr: pâte brisée
hr: prhko tijesto
it: pasta frolla
nl: kruimeldeeg
nn: mørdeig
pt: massa quebrada
sv: pajdeg

fr: pâte feuilletée
de: Blätterteig
hr: lisnato tijesto
it: pasta sfoglia
nl: bladerdeeg

en: dried pasta
fr: pâte sèche
it: pasta secca

en: egg pasta
af: eier pasta
de: Eierteigwaren
fi: munapasta
fr: pâtes aux œufs, pâtes aux oeufs
hr: tjestenina od jaja
id: pasta telur
it: pasta all'uovo
nl: eierpasta
pl: makaron jajeczny

en: fresh egg pasta
de: frische Eierteigwaren, frische Eiernudeln
es: pasta alimenticia fresca compuesta al huevo
fr: pâtes fraîches aux oeufs
hr: tjestenina od svježih jaja
it: pasta fresca all'uovo
nl: verse eierpasta

en: pastry, pastry dough, pie dough
de: Gebäckteig, Kuchenteig
fr: pâte à tarte
hr: tijesto za pecivo
it: pasticceria

en: shortbread, shortbread cookie, shortbread cookies
xx: shortbread
af: brosbrood
ar: مخبوز هش
he: שורטברד
ja: ショートブレッド
jv: Roti cekak
ko: 쇼트브레드
zh: 奶油酥餅

en: sablé, sablés, sablé biscuit, sablé cookie
xx: sablé
fr: sablé, sablés

en: Shortbread cookies from Brittany
fr: Galettes bretonnes, galette bretonne, Galettes bretonnes au beurre, sablé breton, sablés bretons
it: biscotti di pasta frolla della Bretagna

en: Cooked shortbread dough
fr: Pâte sablée cuite
it: pasta frolla cotta

en: Jodenkoeken
de: Jodenkoek
hr: jodenkoeken
it: jodenkoeken
nb: Jødekaker
nl: Jodenkoeken, Jodekoeken
nn: Jødekaker
pt: Jodenkoek
sv: Judebröd
th: โยเดิงกุก

en: bretzel
fr: bretzel
hr: bretzel
it: bretzel
nl: pretzel

en: gingerbread
cs: perník
de: Lebkuchen, Pfefferkuchen
es: pan de jengibre
fi: piparkakku
fr: pain d'épices
hr: medenjak
hu: mézeskalács
ia: pan de specie
it: pan di zenzero, panpepato
ja: パン・デピス
jv: roti jaé
lv: piparkūka
mr: जिंजरब्रेड
nl: peperkoek
nn: peparkake
pl: piernik, pierniki
pt: pão de mel
ro: turtă dulce
sv: pepparkaka
zh: 香料糕饼

fr: galette
de: Fladenbrot
it: galletta

en: vermicelli, Semiya
de: Fadennudeln
fi: vermiselli
fr: vermicelle, vermicelles
hr: vermicelli
it: vermicelli
nl: vermicelli
pl: vermicelli
uk: вермішель

en: nachos
ar: ناتشوز
be: начас
bg: начос
ca: nachos
cs: nachos
de: nachos
el: νάτσος
es: nachos
eu: nachos
fa: ناچوز
fi: nacho
fr: nachos
gl: nacho
he: נאצ'וס
hr: načos
id: nacho
it: nachos
ja: ナチョス
jv: nacho
ka: ნაჩო
kn: ನಾಚೋಸ್
ko: 나초
la: nachos
lt: načios
ml: നാച്ചോസ്
ms: nachos
nb: nachos
ne: नाचोस्
nl: nacho's
pa: ਨਾਚੋਜ਼
pl: nachos, nachosy
pt: nachos
ro: nachos
ru: начос
sk: nachos
sv: nachos
ta: நாச்சோ
tr: nachos
uk: начос
vi: nacho
zh: 烤乾酪辣味玉米片

en: bread
aa: gaqambo
ab: мгьал
af: brood
ak: Brodo
am: ዳቦ
an: pan
ar: خبز
ay: T'ant'a
az: çörək
ba: икмәк
be: хлеб
bg: хляб
bm: buuru
bn: রুটি
br: bara
bs: hljeb
ca: pa
ce: бепиг
co: pane
cr: ᐲᐧᓭᐋᐃᐦᑯᓈᐤ
cs: chléb
cu: хлѣбъ
cv: çăкăр
cy: bara
da: brød
de: Brot
ee: abolo
el: ψωμί
eo: pano
es: pan
et: leib
eu: ogi
fa: نان
fi: leipä
fj: madrai
fo: breyð
fr: pain
fy: bôle
ga: arán
gd: aran
gl: pan
gn: mbujape
gu: રોટલી
gv: arran
ha: Gurasa
he: לחם
hi: डबलरोटी
hr: kruh, krušne, mješavina za izradu kruha
ht: pen
hu: kenyér
hy: հաց
ia: pan
id: roti
ie: pane
ig: achicha
ik: Punniq
io: pano
is: brauð
it: pane, di pane
iu: ᕿᖂᔭᖅ
ja: パン
jv: roti
ka: პური
kg: pane
ki: mugate
kk: нан
kl: iffiaq
km: នំប៉័ង
kn: ಬ್ರೆಡ್
ko: 빵
ku: nan
kw: bara
ky: нан
la: panis
lb: Brout
li: broed
ln: Límpa
lo: ເຂົ້າຈີ່
lt: duona
lv: maize
mg: mofo
mi: parāoa
mk: леб
ml: റൊട്ടി
mn: талх
mr: पाव
ms: roti
mt: ħobż
my: နံပြား
nb: brød
ne: रोटी
nl: brood
nn: brød
nv: bááh
oc: pan
om: Daabboo
or: ପାଓରୁଟୀ
os: дзул
pa: ਬਰੈਡ
pl: chleb
ps: ډوډۍ
pt: pão
qu: t'anta
rm: paun
ro: pâine
ru: хлеб
rw: umugati
sa: रोटी
sc: pane
se: láibi
sh: hljeb
si: පාන්
sk: chlieb
sl: kruh
sn: chingwa
so: rooti
sq: buka
sr: хлеб
st: bohobe
su: roti
sv: bröd
sw: mkate
ta: வெதுப்பி
te: రొట్టె
tg: нон
th: ขนมปัง
tk: çörek
tl: tinapay
tr: ekmek
tt: Ипи
ty: faraoa
ug: نان
uk: хліб
ur: روٹی
uz: non
vi: bánh mì
vo: bod
wa: pwin
wo: Mburu
yi: ברויט
zh: 麵包
zu: isinkwa

en: crispbread
da: knækbrød
de: Knäckebrot
nb: knekkebrød
nn: knekkebrød
sv: knäckebröd